California statutes. Penal Code
Upon the request of a licensed bail agent or bail bond licensee, as described in Sections 1276 and 1276.5, a local law enforcement agency may furnish an individual’s known aliases and booking photograph, information identifying whether the individual has been convicted of any violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, and an unaltered copy of the booking and property record, excluding any medical information, to the agent or licensee if all of the following circumstances exist:

(a) The information is from the record of a person for whom a bench warrant has been issued, or for whom a bail forfeiture has been ordered.

(b) The person described in subdivision (a) is a client of the agent or licensee.

(c) The agent or licensee pays to the law enforcement agency a fee equal to the cost of providing the information.

(d) Any information obtained pursuant to this section is confidential and the recipient bail agent or bail bond licensee shall not disclose its contents, other than for the purpose for which it was acquired. A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a person is required to submit fingerprints or a fingerprint card to the Department of Justice for a criminal background investigation for purposes of employment, certification, or licensing, and the department determines either that it is impossible for the person to submit fingerprints or that the submitted fingerprints are not legible for identification purposes, the department, in its discretion, shall do either of the following:

(1) Make a determination that the person presently is unable to provide legible fingerprints, and therefore shall be deemed to have complied with the statutory requirement to submit fingerprints. The department, using available personal identifying data that the department deems appropriate, shall then conduct a search to determine if the person has a criminal history.

(2) Request that the person submit a second set of fingerprints or obtain verification from another law enforcement agency that he or she is unable to provide legible fingerprint impressions either manually or electronically. If the department requests law enforcement verification of the quality of fingerprints that the person is able to provide, it may designate the law enforcement agency that is to provide the verification and provide a form for the verification. If the second set of fingerprints is illegible or if the designated law enforcement agency verifies that the person is unable to submit legible fingerprints, the person shall be deemed to have complied with the statutory requirement to submit fingerprints, and the department, using available personal identifying data it deems appropriate, shall conduct a search to determine if the person has a criminal history.

(b) After a search of its data bases pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall issue a certificate regarding the criminal history of the applicant to the employing, licensing, or certifying agency. This certificate shall indicate whether or not the applicant has any reportable criminal history for purposes of the employment, license, or certificate the applicant is seeking. The agency shall be entitled to receive information regarding any reportable offenses and may use this information to make a determination of eligibility.

(c) Whenever the department determines pursuant to this section that a person has a criminal record, the person shall be provided an opportunity to question the accuracy or completeness of any material matter contained in the record, under the procedures provided in Section 11126.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section shall only apply to those persons who are unable to supply legible fingerprints due to disability, illness, accident, or other circumstances beyond their control and does not apply to persons who are unable to provide fingerprints because of actions they have taken to avoid submitting their fingerprints.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.75.

(a) (1) If, in the course of performing a criminal history background investigation for an agency or entity statutorily authorized to receive a criminal history, the Department of Justice determines that it appears that the applicant has criminal history record information that the requesting agency is statutorily authorized to receive, but the identity of the applicant cannot be verified with fingerprints, the department shall provide a copy of the criminal history record to the requesting agency or entity but shall note any entries as to which the identity of the subject has not been fingerprint verified.

(2) The department shall compare all available identifying characteristics of the applicant with those that appear in the criminal history information before responding to the requesting agency or entity with conviction disposition information that has not been fingerprint verified.

(b) If an agency or entity denies a license, certificate, or employment based upon information received from the department that is not fingerprint verified, the agency or entity shall notify the applicant of its decision and that he or she may challenge the identification. In that case, the applicant may appeal the decision of the agency or entity on the grounds that the applicant is not the person so identified.

(c) Neither the department nor any of its employees or any requesting agency or entity shall be liable to any applicant for misidentifications made pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 623, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2002, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 623.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.8.

A nonprofit organization that is funded pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 3796h of Title 42 of the United States Code may be granted access to local, state, or federal criminal justice system information available to law enforcement agencies, including access to the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, provided that the nonprofit agency meets all other federal and state requirements for access to that information or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 719, Sec. 53.   (SB 856)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.9.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 11105 and subdivision (a) of Section 13305, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may provide the social security numbers of current or former inmates to the Employment Development Department, the California Workforce Development Board, or the California Workforce Development Board’s designee for the purposes set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 14013 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. The Employment Development Department, the California Workforce Development Board, and any board designee shall keep the social security numbers confidential and use them only to track the labor market and other employment outcomes of program participants, as described in
 subdivision (i) of Section 14013 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide the name, known aliases, birth date, social security number, and booking date and expected release date, if known, consistent with federal law, of a current inmate to the Employment Development Department for the
 purpose set forth in Section 321.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide the information to the Employment Development Department pursuant to this paragraph on the first of every month and upon request by the Employment Development Department.

(b) The Employment Development Department, the California Workforce Development Board, and any board designee shall not disseminate social security numbers obtained pursuant to this section to an individual or public entity not identified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 511, Sec. 1.   (AB 110)   Effective October 5, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.

(a) (1) In order to assist in the investigation of crime, the prosecution of civil actions by city attorneys pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the arrest and prosecution of criminals, and the recovery of lost, stolen, or found property, the Attorney General shall keep and properly file a complete record of all of the following:

(A) All copies of fingerprints.

(B) Copies of licenses to carry firearms issued pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, 26170, or 26215.

(C) Information reported to the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 18120, Section 26225, 26556,
 26892, 27875, 27920, 27966, 28050, 29180, 29830, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 32000.

(D) Dealers’ Records of Sale of firearms.

(E) Reports provided pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) of Chapter 4 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6, or pursuant to any provision listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16585.

(F) Forms provided pursuant to Section 12084, as that section read prior to being repealed on January 1, 2006.

(G) Reports provided pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6, that are not Dealers’ Records of Sale of firearms.

(H) Information provided pursuant to Section 28255.

(I) Reports of stolen, lost, found, pledged, or pawned property in any city or county of this state.

(J) Reports or information provided to the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 29813.

(2) The Attorney General shall, upon proper application therefor, furnish the information to the officers referred to in Section 11105.

(b) (1) The Attorney General shall permanently keep and properly file and maintain all information reported to the Department of Justice pursuant to the following provisions as to firearms and
 maintain a registry thereof:

(A) Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(B) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) of Chapter 4 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(C) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050) of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(D) Any provision listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16585.

(E) Former Section 12084.

(F) Section 28255.

(G) Section 29180.

(H) Paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (e) of Section 32000.

(I) Any other law.

(2) The registry shall consist of all of the following:

(A) The name, address, identification of, place of birth (state or country), complete telephone number, occupation, sex, description, and all legal names and aliases ever used by the owner or person being loaned the particular firearm as listed on the information provided to the department on the Dealers’ Record of Sale, the Law Enforcement Firearms Transfer (LEFT), as defined in former Section 12084, or reports made to the department pursuant to any provision listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16585, Section 28255 or 29180, or any other law.

(B) The name and address of, and other information about, any person (whether a dealer or a private
 party) from whom the owner acquired or the person being loaned the particular firearm and when the firearm was acquired or loaned as listed on the information provided to the department on the Dealers’ Record of Sale, the LEFT, or reports made to the department pursuant to any provision listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16585 or any other law.

(C) Any waiting period exemption applicable to the transaction which resulted in the owner of or the person being loaned the particular firearm acquiring or being loaned that firearm.

(D) The manufacturer’s name if stamped on the firearm, model name or number if stamped on the firearm, and, if applicable, the serial number, other number (if more than one serial number is stamped on the firearm), caliber, type of firearm, if the firearm is new or used, barrel length, and color of the firearm, or, if the firearm is not a handgun and does
 not have a serial number or any identification number or mark assigned to it, that shall be noted.

(3) Information in the registry referred to in this subdivision shall, upon proper application therefor, be furnished to the officers referred to in Section 11105, to a city attorney prosecuting a civil action, solely for use in prosecuting that civil action and not for any other purpose, or to the person listed in the registry as the owner or person who is listed as being loaned the particular firearm.

(4) If any person is listed in the registry as the owner of a firearm through a Dealers’ Record of Sale prior to 1979, and the person listed in the registry requests by letter that the Attorney General store and keep the record electronically, as well as in the record’s existing photographic, photostatic, or nonerasable optically stored form, the Attorney General shall do so within
 three working days of receipt of the request. The Attorney General shall, in writing, and as soon as practicable, notify the person requesting electronic storage of the record that the request has been honored as required by this paragraph.

(c) (1) If the conditions specified in paragraph (2) are met, any officer referred to in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11105 may disseminate the name of the subject of the record, the number of the firearms listed in the record, and the description of any firearm, including the make, model, and caliber, from the record relating to any firearm’s sale, transfer, registration, or license record, or any information reported to the Department of Justice pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Section 26225, 26556, 27875, 27920, 27966, or 29180.

(B) Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(C) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) of Chapter 4 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(D) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050) of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(E) Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150) of Chapter 6 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(F) Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900) of Chapter 2 of Division 10 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(G) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(H) Any provision listed in
 subdivision (a) of Section 16585.

(I) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 32000.

(2) Information may be disseminated pursuant to paragraph (1) only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The subject of the record has been arraigned for a crime in which the victim is a person described in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 6211 of the Family Code and is being prosecuted or is serving a sentence for the crime, or the subject of the record is the subject of an emergency protective order, a temporary restraining order, or an order after hearing, which is in effect and has been issued by a family court under the Domestic Violence Prevention Act set forth in Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code.

(B) The information is disseminated only to the victim of the crime or to the person who has obtained the emergency protective order, the temporary restraining order, or the order after hearing issued by the family court.

(C) Whenever a law enforcement officer disseminates the information authorized by this subdivision, that officer or another officer assigned to the case shall immediately provide the victim of the crime with a “Victims of Domestic Violence” card, as specified in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (c) of Section 13701.

(3) The victim or person to whom information is disseminated pursuant to this subdivision may disclose it as they deem necessary to protect themselves or another person from bodily harm by the person who is the subject of the record.

(d) All information
 collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained by the department and shall be available to researchers affiliated with the California Firearm Violence Research Center at UC Davis for academic and policy research purposes upon proper request and following approval by the center’s governing institutional review board when required. At the department’s discretion, and subject to Section 14240, information collected pursuant to this section may be provided to any other nonprofit bona fide research institution accredited by the United States Department of Education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation for the study of the prevention of violence and following approval by the institution’s governing institutional review board or human subjects committee when required. Material identifying individuals shall only be provided for research or statistical activities and shall not be transferred, revealed, or used for purposes other than research or statistical activities, and reports or publications
 derived therefrom shall not identify specific individuals. Reasonable costs to the department associated with the department’s processing of such data may be billed to the researcher. If a request for data or letter of support for research using the data is denied, the department shall provide a written statement of the specific reasons for the denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.1.   (SB 368)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.1.

Any system of microphotography, optical disk, or reproduction by other techniques that do not permit additions, deletions, or changes to the original document, may be used by the Department of Justice as a photographic reproduction process to record some or all instruments, papers, photographs, and notices that are required or permitted by law to be recorded or filed. All storage medium shall comply with minimum standards of quality approved by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1270, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.2.

Any criminal justice agency may cause any or all files or records in its official custody to be microphotographed or otherwise reproduced pursuant to Section 11106.1, as in the case of original filings or recordings, or both. Every reproduction shall be deemed and considered an original, and as a transcript, exemplification or certified copy, as the case may be, of the original.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 257, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.3.

Fingerprints may be stored or created in an electronic format that does not permit additions, deletions or changes to the original fingerprints so long as the storage medium complies with the minimum standards of quality approved by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 65, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.4.

(a) Every law enforcement agency shall develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standard protocols pertaining to the best manner to conduct a “welfare check,” when the inquiry into the welfare or well-being of the person is motivated by a concern that the person may be a danger to himself or herself or to others. The policies shall encourage a peace officer, prior to conducting the welfare check and whenever possible and reasonable, to conduct a search of the Department of Justice Automated Firearms System via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System to determine whether the person is the registered owner of a firearm.

(b) For purposes of this section, “reasonable” as used in subdivision (a) means that the officer
 could conduct the firearm registry check without undue burden on the execution of the officer’s other duties, that there are no exigent circumstances demanding immediate attention, and that the peace officer has access to, or can reasonably ascertain, relevant identifying information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 918, Sec. 1.   (SB 505)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.

Each sheriff or police chief executive shall furnish all of the following information to the Department of Justice on standard forms approved by the department:

Daily reports of those misdemeanors and felonies that are required to be reported by the Attorney General including, but not limited to, forgery, fraud-bunco, bombings, receiving or selling stolen property, safe and commercial burglary, grand theft, child abuse, homicide, threats, and offenses involving lost, stolen, found, pledged, or pawned property.

The reports required by this section shall describe the nature and character of each such crime and note all particular circumstances thereof and include all additional or supplemental data. The Attorney General may also require that the report shall indicate whether or not the submitting agency considers the information to be confidential because it was compiled for the purpose of a criminal investigation of suspected criminal activities. The term “criminal investigation” includes the gathering and maintenance of information pertaining to suspected criminal activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1613, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.5.

The Attorney General shall report annually to the Legislature concerning the information pertaining to the sexual abuse of children reported to the Department of Justice pursuant to Sections 11107 and 11169. No confidential information shall be released in the reports submitted to the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 592, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.6.

The Department of Justice shall inform the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Standing Committee on Public Safety, and the Assembly Committee on Public Safety within 30 days of determining that a legislative enactment is likely to be needed for an entity that is authorized to receive criminal history information pursuant to state or federal law to reestablish or retain proper authorization for an applicant population.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 38.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.

Each sheriff or police chief executive shall submit descriptions of serialized property, or nonserialized property that has been uniquely inscribed, which has been reported stolen, lost, found, recovered, held for safekeeping, or under observation, directly into the appropriate Department of Justice automated property system for stolen bicycles, stolen vehicles, or other property, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.   (AB 2222)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.2.

(a) A law enforcement agency shall enter or cause to be entered into the Department of Justice Automated Firearms System each firearm that has been reported stolen, lost, found, recovered, held for safekeeping, surrendered pursuant to Section 26892, 28050, or 29830, relinquished pursuant to Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure, Section 6389 of the Family Code, Section 18120 of this code, or any other section of law that requires relinquishment or surrender of firearms to that law enforcement agency, or under observation, within seven calendar days after being notified of the precipitating event.

(b) Information about a firearm entered into the automated system for firearms shall remain in the system until the reported firearm has been
 found, recovered, is no longer under observation, or the record is determined to have been entered in error.

(c) Any costs incurred by the Department of Justice to implement subdivision (b) shall be reimbursed from funds other than fees charged and collected pursuant to Sections 28225, 28230, and 28233.

(d) As used in this section, “law enforcement agency” means a police or sheriff’s department, or any department or agency of the state or any political subdivision thereof that employs any peace officer as defined in Section 830, including, but not limited to, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the University of California or California State University Police Departments, and the police department of any school district, transit district, airport, and harbor, port, or housing authority.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 13.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.3.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 11108.2 that apply to a law enforcement agency’s duty to report to the Department of Justice the recovery of a firearm, a law enforcement agency described in Section 11108.2 shall, and any other law enforcement agency or agent, including but not limited to a federal or tribal law enforcement agency or agent, may, report to the department in a manner determined by the Attorney General in consultation with the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives all available information necessary to identify and trace the history of all recovered firearms that are illegally possessed, have been used in a crime, or are suspected of having been used in a crime, within seven calendar days of obtaining the information.

(b) When the department receives information from a law enforcement agency pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall promptly forward this information to the National Tracing Center of the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives to the extent practicable.

(c) In implementing this section, the Attorney General shall ensure to the maximum extent practical that both of the following apply:

(1) The information provided to the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives enables that agency to trace the ownership of the firearm described in subdivision (a).

(2) Law enforcement agencies can report all relevant information without being unduly burdened by this reporting function.

(d) Information collected pursuant to
 this section shall be maintained by the department for a period of not less than 10 years, and shall be available, under guidelines set forth by the Attorney General, for academic and policy research purposes.

(e) The department shall, on an ongoing basis, analyze the information collected pursuant to this section for patterns and trends relating to recovered firearms that have been illegally possessed, used in a crime, or suspected to have been used in a crime, including the leading sources and origins of those firearms.

(f) (1) The department shall, by no later than July 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, prepare and submit a report to the Legislature summarizing the analysis completed pursuant to
 subdivisions (e) and (g). This report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) The report shall, without limitation and to the extent possible, include all of the following:

(A) The total number of firearms recovered in the state.

(B) The number of firearms recovered, disaggregated by county and by city.

(C) The number of firearms recovered, disaggregated by the firearms dealer where the most recent sale or transfer of the firearm occurred. This shall include the full name and address of the firearms dealer.

(D) The number of firearms recovered, disaggregated by manufacturer.

(E) The total number of unserialized firearms recovered in the state.

(F) The number of unserialized firearms recovered, disaggregated by county and by city.

(3) The department shall make the report described in this subdivision available to the public.

(g) The report described in subdivision (f) shall also contain all of the following information from the applicable time period described in subdivision (h):

(1) The department’s staffing levels for conducting firearms dealer inspections pursuant to Section 26720 and ammunition vendor inspections pursuant to Section 30345, to include both allocated positions and
 filled positions.

(2) The number of firearms dealer inspections conducted and, for each inspection, all of the following information:

(A) The name of the dealer.

(B) The dealer’s license number.

(C) The business address of the dealer.

(D) The number of hours spent to complete the inspection.

(E) A list of violations identified through the inspection, whether those violations were subsequently resolved and, if so, the date they were resolved, and any fines or penalties assessed.

(F) The date of reinspection, if applicable, and any violations identified during
 reinspection.

(G) The dates of any prior inspections.

(H) The number of Dealers’ Record of Sale (DROS) background checks submitted by the dealer during the one-year period prior to the inspection, and the outcome of those background checks.

(I) The total number of firearms used in crimes that were traced back to the dealer during the one-year period prior to the inspection, and the percentage of total sales by the dealer in the same period of time that the traced firearms represent.

(J) The number of firearms that the dealer reported or discovered lost or stolen during the one-year period prior to the inspection.

(3) The number of ammunition vendor inspections conducted and, for each
 inspection, all of the following information:

(A) The name of the vendor.

(B) The vendor’s license number.

(C) The business address of the vendor.

(D) The number of hours spent to complete the inspection.

(E) A list of violations identified through the inspection, whether those violations were subsequently resolved and, if so, the date they were resolved, and any fines or penalties assessed.

(F) The date of reinspection, if applicable, and any violations identified during reinspection.

(G) The dates of any prior inspections.

(H) The number of ammunition purchaser background checks submitted by the vendor during the one-year period prior to the inspection, and the outcome of those background checks.

(I) The amount of ammunition that the vendor reported or discovered lost or stolen during the one-year period prior to the inspection.

(4) All of the following information regarding the roster of handguns that have been determined not to be unsafe handguns, as described in Section 32015:

(A) The total number of handguns on the roster.

(B) The number of handguns added to the roster during the applicable time
 period.

(C) The number of handguns removed from the roster during the applicable time period, including the reasons for removal.

(D) The number of handguns that were denied approval to be listed on the roster during the applicable time period, including the reasons for denial.

(h) The report described in subdivision (f) that is due by no later that July 1, 2025, shall include the data described in subdivision (g) from January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2024, inclusive. Each annual report thereafter shall include the data described in subdivision (g) from the previous year.

(i) The Attorney General may issue regulations to further the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 546, Sec. 1.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.5.

(a) If a law enforcement agency identifies serialized property or any property reported pursuant to Section 21628 of the Business and Professions Code that has been reported lost or stolen by the owner or a person entitled to possession of the property and the property has been entered into the appropriate Department of Justice automated property system pursuant to Section 11108 or 11108.2, the agency shall notify the owner or person claiming to be entitled to possession of the property of the location of the property within 15 days of making the identification. If the location of the property was reported by a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer pursuant to Section 21630 of the Business and Professions Code, notwithstanding the method by which the property was identified, notice shall be given to the party who reported
 the property lost or stolen pursuant to Section 21647 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) If the property is in the custody of the law enforcement agency and it is determined that the property is no longer required for use as evidence in a criminal case, the property shall be made available to the person entitled to possession pursuant to Section 1417.5 or if the property was found in the possession of a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer, pursuant to Section 21647 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to the return to an owner of a lost or stolen vehicle, as defined in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code if the report of theft or loss of the vehicle into the automated property system preceded the report of the acquisition of property as set forth in Section 21628 of the Business and Professions Code by a licensed
 pawnbroker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 864, Sec. 4.   (AB 2222)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.9.

Each local law enforcement agency shall develop, in conjunction with and subject to the approval of the Department of Justice, a succinct Serial Number Restoration Plan setting forth the goals for reduction in the number of recovered firearms that cannot be traced due to obliterated serial numbers, and the methods that the local agency will follow in order to achieve these goals, including, but not limited to, establishing local programs for restoring serial numbers and accessing resources of the Department of Justice or the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms
 and Explosives for restoring serial numbers. These plans shall be submitted to the Department of Justice by January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 2.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.10.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Sections 11108.2 and 11108.3, a local law enforcement agency may cause to be entered into the United States Department of Justice, National Integrated Ballistic Information Network (NIBIN) information to ensure that representative samples of fired bullets and cartridge cases collected at crime scenes, from test-fires of firearms recovered at crime scenes, and other firearm information needed to investigate crimes, are recorded into the NIBIN in accordance with the protocol set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) The Attorney General, in cooperation with those law enforcement agencies that choose to do so, shall develop a protocol for the implementation of this section.

(c) The Attorney General shall have the authority to issue guidelines to further the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 864, Sec. 5.   (AB 2222)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11109.

Each coroner promptly shall furnish the Department of Justice with copies of fingerprints on standardized eight-inch by eight-inch cards, and descriptions and other identifying data, including date and place of death, of all deceased persons whose deaths are in classifications requiring inquiry by the coroner where the coroner is not satisfied with the decedent’s identification. When it is not physically possible to furnish prints of the 10 fingers, prints or partial prints of any fingers, with other identifying data, shall be forwarded by the coroner to the department.

In all cases where there is a criminal record on file in the department for the decedent, the department shall notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and each California sheriff and chief of police in whose jurisdiction the decedent has been arrested, of the date and place of death of the decedent.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11113 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11111.

The Department of Justice shall maintain records relative to stolen and lost bicycles in the Criminal Justice Information System. Such records shall be accessible to authorized law enforcement agencies through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 971.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.

The Department of Justice, in providing fingerprint clearances for employment purposes, shall facilitate the processing of fingerprint cards of employees of, and applicants for employment with, community care facilities, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, which provide services to children, and child day care facilities, as defined in Section 1596.750 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 927, Sec. 6.   Effective September 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Fingerprints and Photographs [11112.1. - 11112.7.]

11112.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “California Identification System” or “Cal-ID” means the automated system maintained by the Department of Justice for retaining fingerprint files and identifying latent fingerprints.

(b) “Remote Access Network” or “RAN” means a uniform statewide network of equipment and procedures allowing local law enforcement agencies direct access to the California Identification System.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Justice.

(d) “Cal-ID Telecommunications System” means a statewide telecommunications network dedicated to the transmission of fingerprint identification data in conjunction with Cal-ID for use by law enforcement agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1234, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.2.

The department shall develop a master plan recommending the type, number, and location of equipment necessary to implement RAN. The department shall also develop policy guidelines and administrative procedures to facilitate the implementation and use of RAN. The RAN master plan shall include reasonable interface specifications to access Cal-ID and shall be provided to any supplier of automated fingerprint identification systems interested in bidding on RAN by May 15, 1986.

The master plan shall provide for the use of facsimile and direct image “live read” fingerprint equipment under RAN, including point-of-booking terminals. 

The department shall amend the master plan to include additional processing, matching, and communications equipment at the Department of Justice, and to recommend the type, number, and location of equipment necessary to implement facsimile and direct image “live read” fingerprint equipment as part of RAN, including point-of-booking terminals. Funding shall be on a shared basis between the state and a region pursuant to Section 11112.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1263, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.3.
